Missouri, session 2026, SB1776.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 193.165, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 193.165,
to read as follows:
193.165. 1. Each spontaneous fetal death of twenty
completed weeks gestation or more, calculated from the date
the last normal menstrual period began to the date of
delivery, or a weight of three hundred fifty grams or more,
which occurs in this state shall be reported within seven
days after delivery to the local registrar or as otherwise
directed by the state registrar.
2. When a dead fetus is delivered in an institution,
the person in charge of the institution or his or her
designated representative shall prepare and file the report.
3. When a dead fetus is delivered outside an
institution, the physician in attendance at or immediately
after delivery shall prepare and file the report.
4. When a spontaneous fetal death required to be
reported by this section occurs without medical attendance
at or immediately after the delivery or when inquiry is
required by the medical examiner or coroner, the medical

SB 1776 2
examiner or coroner shall investigate the cause of
spontaneous fetal death and shall prepare and file the
report within seven days; provided, that when a licensed
treating physician has determined, in writing, the
nonviability of the pregnancy preceding the spontaneous
fetal death, such written determination shall serve as
sufficient evidence for purposes of this section and the
treating physician shall prepare and file the report within
seven days of receiving notice of the spontaneous fetal
death.
5. When a spontaneous fetal death occurs in a moving
conveyance and the fetus is first removed from the
conveyance in this state or when a dead fetus is found in
this state and the place of the spontaneous fetal death is
unknown, the spontaneous fetal death shall be reported in
this state. The place where the fetus was first removed
from the conveyance or the dead fetus was found shall be
considered the place of the spontaneous fetal death.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, individuals with direct and tangible interest, as
defined by the department of health and senior services, may
receive the spontaneous fetal death report.
7. In the event of a spontaneous fetal death,
regardless of whether such death occurs before or after
August 28, 2004, either parent, or if both parents are
deceased, a sibling of the stillborn child, shall have the
right to file an application with the state registrar and
other custodians of vital records requesting a certificate
of birth resulting in stillbirth. The certificate shall be
based upon the information available from the spontaneous
fetal death report filed pursuant to this section.
✓